Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-485
Military service; renewal of operator's license; period valid.

(1) The operator's license of any person serving on active duty, other than members of the National Guard or reserves activated for training purposes only, outside the State of Nebraska as a member of the United States Armed Forces, or the spouse of any such person or a dependent of such member of the armed forces, shall be valid during such person's period of active duty and for not more than sixty days immediately following such person's date of separation from service.

(2) Each individual who is applying for renewal of his or her operator's license shall submit his or her previous license to the department personnel or, when the previous license is unavailable, furnish proof of identification in accordance with section 60-484.

Laws 1929, c. 148, § 8, p. 516;

C.S.1929, § 60-408;

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 18, p. 515;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-408;

R.S.1943, § 60-411;

Laws 1945, c. 141, § 7, p. 453;

Laws 1947, c. 207, § 4, p. 678;

Laws 1961, c. 315, § 8, p. 1004;

Laws 1961, c. 316, § 8, p. 1014;

Laws 1967, c. 389, § 2, p. 1213;

Laws 1967, c. 234, § 5, p. 625;

Laws 1971, LB 244, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 877, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 811, § 5;

Laws 1985, LB 240, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 284, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-411;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 71;

Laws 1996, LB 974, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 22, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 60-4,121;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 55.
July 18, 2026